Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.72.060

Perjury and false swearing—Retraction.

No person shall be convicted of perjury or false swearing if he or she retracts his or her false statement in the course of the same proceeding in which it was made, if in fact he or she does so before it becomes manifest that the falsification is or will be exposed and before the falsification substantially affects the proceeding. Statements made in separate hearings at separate stages of the same trial, administrative, or other official proceeding shall be treated as if made in the course of the same proceeding.

[ 2011 c 336 s 393; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 16; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.72.060.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38: See notes following RCW 9A.08.020.